Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,146
Municipalities; sales and use tax; disposition.

The proceeds of the tax levied by an incorporated municipality under the authority of sections 77-27,142 to 77-27,148 shall be distributed to the incorporated municipality for deposit in its general fund.

Laws 1969, c. 629, § 5, p. 2531.